District of Columbia statutes.
32-1413

Severability.

If any provision of this subchapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the remainder of the subchapter, and the application of such provision to other persons and circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

History

May 21, 1946, 60 Stat. 207, ch. 267, § 14

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-415.
1973 Ed., § 36-133.